New Mexico, session 2026, HB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 66-8-101 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 509, as amended) is amended to read: "66-8-101. HOMICIDE BY VEHICLE--GREAT BODILY HARM BY VEHICLE--NEGLIGENT HOMICIDE BY VEHICLE.-- A. Homicide by vehicle is the killing of a human being in the unlawful operation of a motor vehicle. B. Great bodily harm by vehicle is the injuring of a human being, to the extent defined in Section 30-1-12 NMSA 1978, in the unlawful operation of a motor vehicle. C. A person who commits homicide by vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or while under the influence of any drug is guilty of a second degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978. D. A person who commits homicide by vehicle while violating Section 66-8-113 NMSA 1978 is guilty of a [third] second degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978, provided that violation of speeding laws as set forth in the Motor Vehicle Code shall not per se be a basis for violation of Section 66-8-113 NMSA 1978. E. A person who commits great bodily harm by vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, while under the influence of any drug or while violating Section 66-8-113 NMSA 1978 is guilty of a third degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978, provided that violation of speeding laws as set forth in the Motor Vehicle Code shall not per se be a basis for violation of Section 66-8-113 NMSA 1978. F. A person who commits homicide by vehicle or great bodily harm by vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or while under the influence of any drug, as provided in Subsection C or E of this section, and who has incurred a prior DWI conviction within ten years of the occurrence for which the person is being sentenced under this section shall have the person's basic sentence increased by four years for each prior DWI conviction. G. For the purposes of this section, "prior DWI conviction" means: (1) a prior conviction under Section 66-8-102 NMSA 1978; or (2) a prior conviction in New Mexico or any other jurisdiction, territory or possession of the United States, including a tribal jurisdiction, when the criminal act is driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs. H. A person who willfully operates a motor vehicle in violation of Subsection C of Section 30-22-1 NMSA 1978 and directly or indirectly causes the death of or great bodily harm to a human being is guilty of a third degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978. I. Negligent homicide by vehicle is the killing of a human being by a motor vehicle while violating Section 66-8-114 NMSA 1978. A person who commits negligent homicide by vehicle is guilty of a fourth degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978." SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of transportation for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for a statewide education campaign regarding careless driving and reckless driving. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 4 -